Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.360

Hearings—Subpoenas.

The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and/or production of books, documents, and records for purposes of investigating compliance with this chapter or for any hearing under this chapter.

[ 2000 c 144 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 12.]